th: ประเภทแป้นของคีย์บอร์ด: แบบกึ่งถ่วงน้ำหนัก; แบบ Synth-action; แบบถ่วงน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
tr: Klavye tuş tipi: Yarı ağırlıklı; Sentetik aksiyon; Ağırlıklı; Diğer
el: Τύπος πλήκτρου πληκτρολογίου: Ημι-σταθμισμένο; Synth-action; Σταθμισμένο; Άλλο
sv: Typ av tangentbordstangent: Halvviktad; Synth-action; Viktad; Övrigt
ko: 키보드 키 타입: 준가중; 신스 액션; 가중; 기타
ru: Тип клавиш клавиатуры: Полувзвешенная; Синтезаторная; Взвешенная; Другая
da: Type af tastaturtaster: Halvvægtet; Synth-aktion; Vægtet; Andet
ro-RO: Tip clapă claviatură: Semi-ponderată; Acțiune de sintetizare; Ponderată; Altele
sk-SK: Typ klávesu na klaviatúrach: Semi-weighted; Synth-action; Vážený/Weighted; Iné
es: Tipo de tecla de teclado: Teclas semicontrapesadas; Acción de sintetizador; Ponderado; Otros
hu: Billentyű típusa: Félig súlyozott; Synth Action; Súlyozott; Egyéb
ja: キーボードキータイプ: セミウェイト; シンセアクション; ウェイト; その他
zh-TW: 鍵盤按鍵類型: 半加重; 合成; 加重; 其他
it: Tipo di tasto della tastiera: Semi-pesata; Azione sintetica; Pesata; Altro
fi: Näppäimistön näppäintyyppi: Puolipainotettu; Synth-action; Painotettu; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de tecla do teclado: Semiponderado; Ação sintetizada; Ponderado; Outro
en: Keyboard key type: Semi-weighted; Synth-action; Weighted; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta tipki klavijature: Djelomično ponderirane tipke; Sint-akcija; Ponderirane tipke; Ostalo
lt-LT: Klaviatūros klavišų tipas: Pusiau svertiniai; Sintetiniai klavišai; Svertiniai; Kita
nb: Tastaturtasttype: Halvvektet; Synth-handling; Vektet; Annet
cs: Typ klávesy klávesnice: Polovážené; Pružinové (Synth-action); Vážené; Jiné
nl: Type toetsenbordtoets: Semi-gewogen; Synth-action; Gewogen; Andere
vi: Loại phím bàn phím: Bán nặng; Phím synth; Nặng; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de tecla do teclado: Semipesada; Ação de sintetizador; Pesadas; Outro
de: Tastentyp der Tastatur: Halbgewichtet; Synthesizer; Gewichtet; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 键盘按键类型: 半加权; 合成动作; 加权; 其他
bg-BG: Тип клавиш: Полупретеглени; Действие на синтезатора; Претеглени; Други
fr: Type de touche du clavier: Semi-lesté; Synth-action; Lestée; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta tipk na klaviaturi: Polutežene; Sintetizatorske; Obtežena; Drugo
pl: Rodzaj klawisza: Półwaga; Synth-action; Ważony; Inne